District of Columbia statutes.
29A-101.22

Repealed

Liability of subscribers and shareholders.

Repealed.

June 8, 1954, 68 Stat. 190, ch. 269, § 22
July 23, 1959, 73 Stat. 240, Pub. L. 86-106, § 4
July 2, 2011, D.C. Law 18-378, § 3(j), 58 DCR 1720
2001 Ed., § 29-101.22.
1981 Ed., § 29-322.
1973 Ed., § 29-908i.